District of Columbia statutes.
31-4417

Mutual companies — Requirements before doing business.

No domestic mutual company shall transact any business until at least 200 persons shall have subscribed in the aggregate for at least $200,000 of insurance and shall have paid in full 1 annual premium in money upon the insurance so subscribed.

June 19, 1934, 48 Stat. 1148, ch. 672, ch. III, § 17
Prohibition against assessment companies, see § 31-4331.
1981 Ed., § 35-617.
1973 Ed., § 35-517.